Louisiana, session 2026, SB138.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:47(A)(3),(4), and (5) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
32:47(A)(8) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§47. Use of speed recording devices; restrictions
A. Automated speed enforcement devices or mobile speed cameras that are
used to issue a citation of an alleged violation by mail shall only be used by local
municipal authorities or local parish authorities in the following instances:
* * *
(3) There are forty-eight-inch by forty-eight-inch signs, the bottom of which
shall be at least seven feet from the ground, indicating that a device or camera is
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-304 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 138
present, no less than five hundred feet and no more than one thousand feet before the
device or camera, in a manner as to be clearly visible to approaching traffic. The
signs shall be bright yellow and shall read "Photo enforcement devices at use".
(4) Upon the entrance to each school zone, there shall be painted a two- foot-
wide yellow stripe completely across the roadway with pavement word markings
in accordance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices indicating
"Entering School Zone" painted in twelve-inch white lettering visible therein.
(5) Two hundred feet before the entrance to each school zone, there shall be
painted a two-foot-wide yellow stripe completely across the roadway with pavement
word markings in accordance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control
Devices indicating "School Zone Ahead" painted in twelve-inch white lettering
visible therein.
* * *
(8) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require the use of any
traffic control device or pavement marking that is inconsistent with or not
authorized by the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 32:43(A)(4) is hereby repealed in its entirety.